Hawaii statutes.
§451A-12 Receipt required to be furnished
to a person supplied with hearing aid. (a) Any person who practices the
fitting and sale of hearing aids shall deliver to each purchaser a receipt
containing the licensee's signature, the licensee's business address, and the
number of the licensee's certificate, together with specifications as to the
make and model of the hearing aid furnished and the terms of the sale. If
hearing aid which is not new is sold, the receipt and the container thereof
shall be clearly marked as "used" or "reconditioned", with
the terms of guarantee, if any.

(b) The receipt shall bear, in type no smaller
than the largest that is used in the body copy portion, the following: the
purchaser has been advised at the outset of the purchaser's relationship with
the hearing aid dealer and fitter that any examination or representation made
by a hearing aid dealer and fitter in connection with the fitting and selling
of this hearing aid is not an examination, diagnosis, or prescription by a person
licensed to practice medicine in this State and shall not be considered as
medical opinion or advice. [L 1969, c 205, pt of §1; am L 1974, c 167, §1; gen
ch 1985]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next